North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations
10-33-10.
Corporate name. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The corporate name:

Must be in letters or characters used in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange (ASCII) table.

Need not contain the word “company”, “corporation”, “incorporated”, “limited”, or an abbreviation of one or more of these words.

May not contain the words “limited liability company”, “limited partnership”, “limited liability partnership”, “limited liability limited partnership”, or an abbreviation of these words.

May not contain a word or phrase indicating or implying the corporation:

Is incorporated for a purpose other than:

A lawful nonprofit purpose for which a corporation may be incorporated under this chapter; or

For a purpose stated in its articles; or

May not be incorporated under this chapter.

Must be distinguishable in the records of the secretary of state from:

The name, whether foreign and authorized to conduct activities in this state or domestic unless there is filed with the articles a record that complies with subsection 3, of:

Another corporation;

A corporation incorporated or authorized to do business in this state under another provision of this code;

A limited liability company;

A limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership; or

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name the right to which is, at the time of incorporation, reserved in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

A fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a corporate name is distinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter and may adopt rules reasonable or necessary for making these determinations.

If the secretary of state determines that a corporate name is indistinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter, the corporate name may not be used unless there is filed with the articles:

The written consent of the holder of the rights to the name the proposed name is determined to be indistinguishable; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

Subsection 3 does not affect the right of a corporation existing on August 1, 1997, or a foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state on that date to continue the use of its name.

This section and section 10-33-11 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, or service marks; or

Any other rights to the exclusive use of names or symbols; or

Derogate the common law or the principles of equity.

A domestic or foreign corporation that is the surviving organization in a merger with one or more other organizations, or that acquires by sale, lease, or other disposition to or exchange with an organization all or substantially all of the assets of another organization including its name, may have the same name, subject to the requirements of subsection 1, as that used in this state by any of the other organizations, if the other organization whose name is sought to be used:

Was incorporated, organized, formed, or registered under the laws of this state;

Is authorized to conduct activities or transact business in this state;

Holds a reserved name in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

Holds a fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

Holds a trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

Holds a trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The use of a name by a corporation in violation of this section does not affect or vitiate its corporate existence, but a court in this state may, upon application of the state or of an interested or affected person, enjoin the corporation from conducting activities under a name assumed in violation of this section, although its articles may have been filed with the secretary of state and a certificate of incorporation issued.

A corporation whose period of existence has expired or that is involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state pursuant to section 10-33-139 may reacquire the right to use that name by refiling articles of incorporation pursuant to section 10-33-08 unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment pursuant to subsection 23. A corporation that cannot reacquire the use of its corporate name must adopt a new corporate name that complies with the provisions of this section:

By refiling articles of incorporation pursuant to section 10-33-08;

By amending pursuant to section 10-33-14; or

By reinstating pursuant to section 10-33-139.

Subject to section 10-33-126, this section applies to a foreign corporation transacting business in this state, having a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, or applying for a certificate of authority.

An amendment that only changes the name of the corporation may be authorized by a resolution approved by the board and may be submitted to and approved by the members as provided in section 10-33-15.

A corporation that files its articles of incorporation with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in section 10-33-09 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 134; 2003, ch. 85, § 92; 2005, ch. 100, § 95; 2005, ch. 384, § 4; 2007, ch. 101, § 62; 2011, ch. 87, § 42; contingently amended by 2015, ch. 87, §§ 20, 21, effective July 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 5.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

Collateral References.

Right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another, 37 A.L.R.3d 277.

10-33-11.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a corporate name otherwise permitted by section 10-33-10 may be reserved by any person.

The reservation must be made by filing with the secretary of state a request that the name be reserved, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140:

If the name is available for use by the applicant, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of twelve months.

The reservation may be renewed for successive twelve-month periods.

The right to the exclusive use of a corporate name reserved pursuant to this section may be transferred to another person by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer and specifying the name and address of the transferee, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140.

The right to the exclusive use of a corporate name reserved pursuant to this section may be canceled by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the cancellation, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140.

The secretary of state may destroy all reserved name requests and index thereof one year after expiration.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 93.

10-33-12.
Registered office — Registered agent.

A corporation shall continuously maintain a registered agent in this state as provided by chapter 10-01.1, and if a noncommercial registered agent, then the address of the noncommercial registered agent in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 96; 2007, ch. 99, § 43.

10-33-13.
Change of registered office — Appointment or change of registered agent — Change of name of registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered office, change its registered agent, or state a change in the name of its registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

A registered agent of a corporation may resign as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 135; 2005, ch. 100, § 97; 2007, ch. 99, § 44; 2021, ch. 85, § 14, effective August 1, 2021.

10-33-14.
Amendment of articles.

The articles of a corporation may be amended at any time to include or modify any provision that is required or permitted to appear in the articles or to omit any provision not required to be included in the articles, except that when articles are amended to restate them, the name and address of each incorporator and each initial director may be omitted. If only a change of address of the principal executive office is required, an amendment need not be filed; however, the change of address of the principal executive office must then be reported on the annual report filed after the change or be submitted in writing to the secretary of state without a filing fee. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the articles may be amended or modified only in accordance with section 10-33-15.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2013, ch. 89, § 12; 2015, ch. 86, § 13, effective August 1, 2015.

10-33-15.
Procedure for amendment of articles.

A majority of incorporators may amend the articles by written action if no directors are named in the original articles, if no directors have been elected, and if there are no members with voting rights. A majority of directors may amend the articles if there are no members with voting rights, if members with voting rights have authorized the board to amend the articles under subsection 3, or if the amendment merely restates the existing articles, as amended. Notice of the meeting and of the proposed amendment must be given to the board. An amendment restating the existing articles may, but need not, be submitted to and approved by the members with voting rights as provided in subsection 2.

Amendments to the articles must be approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of all directors and by the members with voting rights. If an amendment is initiated by the directors, proper notice of the proposed amendment must precede a meeting of the members with voting rights at which the amendment will be considered and must include the substance of the proposed amendment. If an amendment is proposed and approved by the members with voting rights, those members may demand a special board meeting within fifty days for consideration of the proposed amendment if a regular board meeting would not occur within fifty days.

The members with voting rights may authorize the board of directors, subject to subdivision c, to exercise from time to time the power of amendment of the articles without approval of the members with voting rights.

When the members with voting rights have authorized the board of directors to amend the articles, the board of directors, by the affirmative vote of a majority of all directors, unless the articles, bylaws, or the members’ resolution authorizing the board action requires a greater vote, may amend the articles at a meeting of the board. Notice of the meeting and of the proposed amendment must be given to the board.

The members with voting rights may prospectively revoke the authority of the board to exercise the power of the members to amend the articles at a meeting called for that purpose.

Articles or bylaws may require greater than majority approval by the board or approval by greater than a majority of a quorum of the voting members for an action under this section and may limit or prohibit the use of mail ballots by voting members.

The articles or bylaws may provide that an amendment also must be approved by the members of a class.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 43.

10-33-16.
Articles of amendment.

When an amendment has been adopted, articles of amendment must be prepared that contain:

The name of the corporation.

The amendment adopted.

The date of the adoption of the amendment pursuant to this chapter.

If the amendment restates the articles in their entirety, a statement that the restated articles supersede the original articles and all amendments to them.

A statement that the amendment has been adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-17.
Effect of amendment.

An amendment does not affect an existing cause of action in favor of or against the corporation, nor a pending suit to which the corporation is a party, nor the existing rights of persons other than members.

If the corporate name is changed by the amendment, a suit brought by or against the corporation under its former name does not abate for that reason.

When effective under section 10-33-19, an amendment restating the articles in their entirety supersedes the original articles and all amendments to the original articles.

Assets held by a corporation, including income or fees from services, are restricted to the uses and purposes for which the property was received or held.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 136.

10-33-18.
Filing articles of amendment.

An original of the articles of amendment must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to the filing requirements of this chapter and that all fees have been paid as provided in section 10-33-140, then the articles of amendment must be recorded in the office of the secretary of state. A corporation that amends the corporate name and which is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner of a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state must change or amend the corporation’s name in each registration when the corporation files an amendment.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 98; 2009, ch. 106, § 48.

10-33-19.
Effective date of articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment are effective upon acceptance by the secretary of state or at another time within thirty days after acceptance if the articles of amendment so provide.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-20.
Amendment of articles in court-supervised reorganization.

Whenever a plan of reorganization of a corporation has been confirmed by decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction in proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation, pursuant to the provisions of any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganization of corporations, the articles may be amended, in the manner provided in this section, in as many respects as may be necessary to carry out the plan, so long as the articles as amended contain only provisions which might be lawfully contained in original articles at the time of making the amendment. In particular, and without limitation upon any general power of amendment, the articles may be amended to:

Change the corporate name, period of duration, or corporate purposes of the corporation.

Repeal, alter, or amend the bylaws of the corporation.

Change the aggregate number of shares, or shares of any class, which the corporation has the authority to issue.

Change the preferences, limitations, relative rights in respect of all or any part of the shares of the corporation, and classify, reclassify, or cancel all or any part thereof, whether issued or unissued.

Authorize the issuance of bonds, debentures, or other obligations of the corporation, whether convertible into shares of any class or bearing warrants or other evidences of optional rights to purchase or subscribe for shares of any class, and fix the terms and conditions thereof.

Constitute or reconstitute and classify or reclassify the board and appoint directors and officers in place of or in addition to all or any of the directors or officers then in office.

Amendments to the articles pursuant to subsection 1 must be made in the following manner:

Articles of amendment approved by decree or order of the court must be executed and verified by the person or persons designated or appointed by the court for that purpose and must set forth the name of the corporation, the amendments of the articles approved by the court, the date of the decree or order approving the articles of amendment, and the title of the proceedings in which the decree or order was entered by a court having jurisdiction of the proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation under the provisions of an applicable statute of the United States.

An original of the articles of amendment must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to the filing requirements of this chapter and that all fees have been paid as provided in section 10-33-140, the original must be recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

The articles of amendment become effective upon their acceptance by the secretary of state or at another time within thirty days after acceptance if the articles of amendment so provide.

The articles are amended accordingly with the same effect as if the amendment had been adopted by unanimous action of the directors and members.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-21.
General powers.

A corporation has the powers set forth in this section, subject to any limitations provided in any other statute of this state or in its articles.

A corporation has perpetual duration.

A corporation may sue and be sued, complain and defend and participate as a party or otherwise in any legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding, in its corporate name.

A corporation may purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, and use and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest in property, wherever situated.

A corporation may sell, convey, mortgage, create a security interest in, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of its real or personal property, or any interest in property, wherever situated.

A corporation may purchase, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, exchange, mortgage, lend, create a security interest in, or otherwise dispose of, use and deal in and with, securities or other interests in, or obligations of, a person or direct or indirect obligations of any domestic or foreign government or instrumentality.

A corporation may make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its securities, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage of or creation of a security interest in all or any of its property, franchises, and income. All assets received by a corporation from donors for special use or purpose must be designated as temporarily restricted or permanently restricted in accordance with the applicable generally accepted accounting principles and disclosed on the corporation’s financial statements. A corporation may pledge as collateral, grant a security interest in, or borrow from assets initially designated as temporarily restricted only for purposes that are in accordance with the donor’s restrictions. A corporation may not pledge as collateral, grant a security interest in, or borrow from assets designated as permanently restricted assets.

A corporation may invest and reinvest its funds.

A corporation may take and hold real and personal property, whether or not of a kind sold or otherwise dealt in by the corporation, as security for the payment of money loaned, advanced, or invested.

A corporation may conduct its activities, carry on its operations, have offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter anywhere in the universe.

Except as otherwise prohibited by law, a corporation may make donations, irrespective of corporate benefit, for:

The public welfare;

Social, community, charitable, religious, educational, scientific, civic, literary, and testing for public safety purposes, and for similar or related purposes;

The purpose of fostering national or international amateur sports competition; and

The prevention of cruelty to children and animals, and for similar or related purposes.

A corporation may pay pensions, retirement allowances, and compensation for past services and establish employee or incentive benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for the benefit of the corporation and the corporation’s related organizations’ officers, managers, directors, governors, employees, and agents and, in the case of a related organization that is a limited liability company, members who provide services to the limited liability company, and the families, dependents, and beneficiaries of any of them. It may indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance for a fiduciary of any of these employee benefit and incentive plans, trusts, and provisions.

A corporation may participate in any capacity in the promotion, organization, ownership, management, and operation of any organization or in any transaction, undertaking, or arrangement that the participating corporation would have power to conduct by itself, whether or not the participation involves sharing or delegation of control.

A corporation may provide for its benefit life insurance and other insurance with respect to the services of its officers, directors, employees, and agents, or on the life of a member for the purpose of acquiring, at the death of the member, any membership interests in the corporation owned by the member.

A corporation may have, alter at pleasure, and use a corporate seal as provided in section 10-33-22.

A corporation may adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws relating to the management of the activities or the regulation of the affairs of the corporation as provided in section 10-33-26.

A corporation may establish committees of the board of directors, elect or appoint persons to the committees, and define their duties as provided in section 10-33-44 and fix their compensation.

A corporation may elect or appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, and define their duties and fix their compensation.

A corporation may lend money to, guarantee an obligation of, become a surety for, or otherwise financially assist persons as provided in section 10-33-82.

A corporation may make advances to its directors, officers, and employees and those of its subsidiaries as provided in section 10-33-83.

A corporation shall indemnify those persons identified in section 10-33-84 against certain expenses and liabilities only as provided in section 10-33-84 and may indemnify other persons.

A corporation may conduct all or part of its activities under one or more trade names as provided in chapter 47-25.

A corporation may take, receive, and hold real and personal property, including the principal and interest of money or other funds, that is given, conveyed, bequeathed, devised to, or vested in the corporation in trust when the corporation or a related organization has a vested or contingent interest in the trust.

Except when the trust instrument prescribes otherwise, a corporation may invest trust property or its proceeds in accordance with chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19.

A corporation may be a member of or the owner of the ownership interest in another domestic or foreign organization.

A corporation may dissolve and wind up.

A corporation may merge and consolidate with other domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations organized for related purposes.

A corporation conducting activities as a hospital may merge with a corporation incorporated for profit and form a corporation under this chapter.

A corporation may acquire an owner’s interest in another organization.

A corporation may have and exercise all other powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the corporation is incorporated.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 31; 2003, ch. 85, § 94; 2007, ch. 549, § 2; 2017, ch. 84, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

10-33-22.
Corporate seal.

A corporation may, but need not, have a corporate seal. The use or nonuse of a corporate seal does not affect the validity, recordability, or enforceability of a record or act. If a corporation has a corporate seal, the use of the seal by the corporation on a record is not necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 99.

10-33-23.
Defense of ultra vires.

No act of a corporation and no conveyance or transfer of real or personal property to or by a corporation is invalid by reason of the fact that the corporation was without capacity or power to do such act or to make or receive such conveyance or transfer but such lack of capacity or power may be asserted:

In a proceeding by a member against the corporation to enjoin the doing of any act or acts or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation. If the unauthorized acts or transfers sought to be enjoined are being, or are to be, performed or made pursuant to any contract to which the corporation is a party, the court, if all of the parties to the contract are parties to the proceeding and if it deems the same to be equitable, may set aside and enjoin the performance of the contract, and in so doing may allow to the corporation or to the other parties to the contract, as the case may be, compensation for the loss or damage sustained by either of them which may result from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of the contract. However, anticipated profits to be derived from the performance of the contract may not be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained.

In a proceeding by the corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver, trustee or other legal representative, or through members in a representative suit, against the incumbent or former officers or directors of the corporation.

In a proceeding by the attorney general, as provided in this chapter, to dissolve the corporation or to enjoin the corporation from the transaction of unauthorized activities.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 95.

10-33-24.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers — Liability.

All persons who assume to act as a corporation without authority are jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-25.
Organization.

If the first board is not named in the articles, the incorporators may elect the first board or may act as directors with all of the powers, rights, duties, and liabilities of directors, until directors are elected.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation, the incorporators or the directors named in the articles shall, within a reasonable time, either hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators or of the directors named in the articles, or take written action, for the purposes of conducting activities and taking actions necessary or appropriate to complete the organization of the corporation. If a meeting is held, the person or persons calling the meeting shall give at least three days’ notice of the meeting to each incorporator or director named, stating the date, time, and place of the meeting. Incorporators and directors may waive notice of an organizational meeting in the same manner that a director may waive notice of meetings of the board pursuant to subsection 5 of section 10-33-39.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 96.

10-33-26.
Bylaws.

A corporation may, but need not, have bylaws. Bylaws may contain any provision relating to the management or regulation of the affairs of the corporation consistent with law or the articles, including:

The number of directors, and the qualifications, manner of election, powers, duties, and compensation, if any, of directors;

The qualifications of members;

Different classes of membership;

The manner of admission, withdrawal, suspension, and expulsion of members;

Property, voting, and other rights and privileges of members;

The appointment and authority of committees;

The appointment or election, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers;

The time, place, and manner of calling, conducting, and giving notice of member, board, and committee meetings, or of conducting mail ballots;

The making of reports and financial statements to members; or

The number establishing a quorum for meetings of members and the board.

Unless reserved by the articles to members with voting rights, initial bylaws may be adopted by a majority of the incorporators or by the first board pursuant to section 10-33-25. Unless reserved by the articles to the members with voting rights, the power to adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws is vested in the board. The power of the board is subject to the power of the members with voting rights exercisable in the manner provided in subsection 3 to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws adopted, amended, or repealed by the board.

The bylaws may be amended in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws.

In the absence of such a provision, the following bylaws amendments are subject to approval by the members with voting rights:

Fixing a quorum for meetings of members;

Prescribing procedures for:

Removing directors;

Filling vacancies in the board; and

Fixing the number of directors or their classifications, qualifications, or terms of office;

Removing or adding members; or

Increasing or decreasing the vote required for member action.

The board may adopt or amend a bylaw provision to increase the number of directors with the approval of the members with voting rights.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less, may propose a resolution for action by the members to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws adopted, amended, or repealed by the board.

The resolution must contain the provisions proposed for adoption, amendment, or repeal.

The limitations and procedures for submitting, considering, and adopting the resolution are the same as provided in section 10-33-15, for amendment of the articles, except that board approval is not required.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 44.

10-33-27.
Board.

The activities and affairs of a corporation must be managed by or under the direction of a board.

All directors are entitled to vote and have equal rights and preferences except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws.

The members of the first board may be named in the articles, designated or appointed pursuant to the articles, or elected by the incorporators under section 10-33-25.

No more than forty-nine percent of the individuals serving on the board of any corporation may be financially interested individuals.

For the purposes of this section, “financially interested individuals” means:

Individuals who have received or are entitled to receive compensation, directly or indirectly, from the corporation for services rendered to it within the previous twelve months, whether as full-time or part-time employees, independent contractors, consultants, or otherwise, excluding any reasonable payments made to directors for serving as directors;

Any parent, child, child of a spouse, brother, or sister of that individual; or

The spouse of any individual described in subdivision a or b.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this section does not affect the validity or enforceability of any transaction entered into by the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 97.

10-33-28.
Number of directors.

With respect to the number of directors:

The board must consist of three or more directors, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws. However, if the corporation has either one or two members with voting rights, the number of directors may be less than three but not less than the number of members with voting rights.

The number of directors may be increased or, subject to sections 10-33-36 and 10-33-37, decreased at any time by amendment to or in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws.

Notwithstanding section 10-33-38, if the power to elect or appoint directors is vested in the board of directors and if the number of directors falls below three, or such greater minimum number set forth in the articles or bylaws, then a majority of the directors in office may appoint or elect the number of additional directors necessary to increase the board to three directors or such greater minimum set forth in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 45.

10-33-29.
Qualifications and election of directors.

Directors must be individuals. The method of election and any additional qualifications for directors may be imposed by or in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-30.
Terms of directors.

With respect to length of terms:

Directors are elected or appointed and hold office for fixed terms provided for in the articles or bylaws. A fixed term of a director, other than an ex officio director, may not exceed ten years. If the articles or bylaws do not provide for a fixed term, the term is one year. An ex officio director serves as long as the director holds the office or position designated in the articles or bylaws.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a director holds office until expiration of the term for which the director was elected or appointed and until a successor is elected and qualified, or until the earlier death, resignation, removal, or disqualification of the director.

A decrease in the number of directors or term of office does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws, the term of a director filling a vacancy expires at the end of the unexpired term that the director is filling.

The articles or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups. The terms of office of the groups need not be uniform.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-31.
Acts not void or voidable.

The expiration of a director’s term with or without the election of a qualified successor does not make prior or subsequent acts of the officers or the board void or voidable.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-32.
Compensation of directors.

Subject to any limitations in the articles or bylaws, the board may fix the compensation of directors.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-33.
Classification of directors.

Except as provided in subsection 2, directors may be divided into classes.

Directors of a corporation described in subsection 1 of section 10-33-122 may not vote by class except when the articles or bylaws provide that only one class of directors may vote on a particular matter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-34.
Cumulative voting for directors.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, there is no cumulative voting.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 100; 2007, ch. 101, § 63.

10-33-35.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by giving written notice to the corporation. The resignation is effective without acceptance when the notice is given to the corporation, unless a later effective time is specified in the notice.

If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-36.
Nonjudicial removal of directors.

This section applies unless a different method of removal is provided for in the articles or bylaws.

With respect to an elected director:

If there is a member with voting rights:

A director may be removed by the board at any time, with or without cause, if:

The director was named by the board to fill a vacancy;

The members with voting rights have not elected directors in the interval between the time of the appointment to fill the vacancy and the time of the removal; and

A majority of the remaining directors present affirmatively vote to remove the director.

A director may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by those members eligible to elect the director.

If there is no member with voting rights, a director may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by those directors eligible to elect the director.

With respect to an appointed director:

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, an appointed director may be removed without cause by the person appointing the director.

The person removing the director shall do so by giving written notice of the removal to the director and either the presiding officer of the board or the corporation’s president or secretary.

A removal is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice states a future effective date.

A new director may be elected at a meeting at which a director is removed.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-37.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The district court of the county in which the principal executive office of a corporation is located may remove any director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation, its members holding at least ten percent of the voting power of any class of shares, or the attorney general, if the court finds:

The director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation;

That the provisions of subsection 2 of section 10-33-27 have been violated; or

Final judgment has been entered finding the director has violated section 10-33-45.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from serving on the board for a period prescribed by the court.

If members or the attorney general commence a proceeding under subdivision a of subsection 1, then the corporation must be made a party defendant.

If a corporation or its members commence a proceeding under subsection 1, they must give the attorney general written notice of the proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.